Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Boards of Elections

117.015.
State Board of Elections — Powers, duties, membership.

There shall be a State Board of Elections that is an independent agency of state government, which shall administer the election laws of the state and supervise registration and purgation of voters within the state. The board:

May promulgate administrative regulations necessary to properly carry out its duties;

Shall promulgate administrative regulations establishing a procedure for elections officials to follow when an election has been suspended or delayed as described in KRS

39A.100

; and

Shall be prohibited from accepting any private monetary funds for election administration unless accepted as part of a valid contract for goods and services.

The State Board of Elections shall consist of the following:

The Secretary of State, who shall be:

A nonvoting member, except in cases of casting a determinative vote, if a vote taken by the board would otherwise result in a tie;

The chief election official for the Commonwealth; and

The chair of the board who shall preside at the meetings of the board;

Two (2) voting members appointed by the Governor as provided in subsection (5) of this section;

Six (6) voting members appointed by the Governor as provided in subsection (4) of this section; and

An executive director appointed in accordance with KRS

117.025

who is a nonvoting member.

The appointed members shall serve for a term of four (4) years or until their successors are appointed. Members shall be at least twenty-five (25) years of age and qualified voters of this state. No appointed member shall be a candidate for public office or have been a candidate for public office for two (2) years prior to his or her appointment, except as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section. No member of the board shall have been convicted of any election law offense.

Two (2) members shall be appointed by the Governor from a separate list of at least five (5) names submitted by the state central executive committee of each of the two (2) political parties that polled the largest vote in the last preceding election for state officials. The list shall be submitted to the Governor by February 15 of 1992, and the appointments of the Governor shall be made by April 1 of the same year. Two (2) separate lists shall be submitted to the Governor by August 15 of 1990 and every four (4) years thereafter, and two (2) appointments shall be made from these lists by September 15 of each year in which the lists are received.

Two (2) members shall be appointed by the Governor from a separate list of at least four (4) names submitted by the Kentucky County Clerk’s Association of each of the two (2) political parties that polled the largest vote in the last preceding regular election for state officials. Each of the two (2) members appointed under this subsection shall be former county clerks. The lists required under this subsection shall be submitted to the Governor by July 15, 2019, and every four (4) years thereafter. The appointments made by the Governor under this subsection shall be made by August 15, 2019, and every four (4) years thereafter.

Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as provided for original appointments, and the person appointed to fill the vacancy shall be of the same political party as his or her predecessor.

The board shall meet as often as necessary to carry out its duties and shall keep a record of its acts, orders, findings, and proceedings. A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum.

The members of the board shall be paid a reasonable sum to be fixed by the secretary of the Personnel Cabinet, with the approval of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, and in addition, their expenses in attending board meetings. The compensation shall be paid out of the State Treasury upon requisition signed by the chair of the board and approved by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 18; 1982, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 341, § 24, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 293, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 154, § 74, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 91, § 2, effective June 20, 2005; 2019 ch. 23, § 2, effective March 19, 2019; 2020 ch. 88, § 3, effective July 15, 2020; 2022 ch. 23, § 4, effective July 14, 2022; 2022 ch. 219, § 6, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2022). This statute was amended by 2022 Ky. Acts chs. 23 and 219, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

(7/14/2022). 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 23, sec. 6, provided that Act, which amended this statute, may be cited as the Stop Outside Influence Over Elections Act of 2022.

117.020.
Declaration
by state board of county’s status as a preclearance county.

The State Board of Elections
may declare a county to be a preclearance county for election purposes when
that county has a history of voter fraud, noncompliance with election laws,
or voter complaints about the integrity of a particular election. In a county
designated as a preclearance county, all decisions of the county board of
elections shall be reported to the State Board of Elections for its review.
The failure of a county board of elections of a preclearance county to submit
its decisions to the State Board of Elections for its review shall constitute
a prima facie case for appointment of an election manager under KRS

117.022

.
The State Board of Elections may require a preclearance county to submit evidence
or justification as required by the state board which is necessary to evaluate
the county board’s decisions. A county designated as a preclearance county
shall retain that designation until it is removed by the State Board of Elections.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 394, § 3, effective July 15, 1994.

117.022.
Judicial
declaration of existence of election crisis — Effect.

The Attorney General, the Secretary
of State, and the State Board of Elections, by mutual agreement, may petition
Franklin Circuit Court to declare that an election crisis exists in a county
where there is evidence of sufficient malfeasance, nonfeasance, or criminal
activity to jeopardize a free and equal election in that county and to authorize
the State Board of Elections to assume responsibility for the management of
the election in that county. If Franklin Circuit Court makes that declaration
and grant of authority, the State Board of Elections shall appoint an election
manager for that county to serve for the duration of the election cycle and
the county clerk, county board of elections, precinct election officers, and
any other person participating in the election process in that county shall
be subject to the direction of the election manager.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 394, § 2, effective July 15, 1994.

117.025.
Executive
director and assistant director — Staff — Powers and duties.

The State Board of Elections shall appoint an executive director, who shall be the chief administrative officer for the board. The board shall also appoint an assistant director, who shall be of a different political party than the director. The salaries of the director and the assistant director shall be set by the board.

The State Board of Elections shall employ, on a bipartisan basis, a staff sufficient to carry out the duties assigned to the board, including legal counsel and a training officer to provide assistance to the county clerks and the county boards of elections in their training of precinct election officers.

The board shall:

Maintain a complete roster of all qualified registered voters within the state by county and precinct, and institute appropriate safeguards to ensure that there is no inappropriate use of the voter registration roster. State and local election officials, including the Secretary of State, employees of the Secretary, and members of the State Board of Elections and their staff, shall only use the voter registration roster for purposes relevant to their prescribed duties of election administration. The Secretary of State, and two (2) employees of the Secretary, who may be designated by the Secretary with explicit written authority and notification to the board, shall have electronic access to the information contained within the voter registration roster, but shall not correct, alter, or delete information from the voter registration roster, unless having obtained prior approval by a majority of the voting members of the board;

For each primary, furnish each county clerk with a master list of all registered voters in the county, together with three (3) signature rosters of all registered voters in each precinct of the county according to party affiliation, and two (2) lists of all registered voters in each precinct of the county at least eighteen (18) days prior to each primary;

For each regular election, furnish each county clerk with a master list of all registered voters in the county, together with one (1) signature roster of all registered voters in each precinct of the county on which each voter’s party affiliation is identified, and two (2) lists of all registered voters in each precinct of the county at least eighteen (18) days prior to each regular election;

Select the required format for any voter registration list provided to a county clerk including those intended for use in an e-poll book product;

Maintain all information furnished to the board relating to the inclusion or deletion of names from the rosters for four (4) years;

Furnish, at a reasonable price, the state central executive committee of each political party qualifying under KRS

118.015

monthly data of all additions, deletions and changes of registration in each precinct of each county and the state central executive committee shall furnish a county listing to each of the county executive committees of each political party;

Purchase, lease or contract for the use of equipment necessary to properly carry out its duties under the provisions of this chapter and KRS Chapters 116 and 118;

Secure information from any source which may assist the board in carrying out the purposes of this section;

Furnish at a reasonable price any and all precinct lists to duly qualified candidates, political party committees or officials thereof, or any committee that advocates or opposes an amendment or public question. The State Board of Elections may also furnish the precinct lists to other persons at the board’s discretion, at a reasonable price to be determined by the board. The board shall not furnish precinct lists to persons who intend to use the lists for commercial use; and

Be responsible for oversight of board personnel, including hiring, investigations, disciplinary actions, promotions, and other like actions subject to KRS Chapter 18A.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 19; 1982, ch. 457, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 185, § 6, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 333, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 48, § 13, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 394, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 2019 ch. 23, § 3, effective March 19, 2019; 2022 ch. 87, § 4, effective April 7, 2022; 2022 ch. 172, § 2, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2022). This statute was amended by
2022 Ky. Acts chs. 87 and
172, which are in conflict. Under
KRS

446.250

, Acts ch. 172, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails.

117.027.
State
board to promulgate record-keeping requirements.

The State Board of Elections
shall promulgate administrative regulations and procedures necessary to:

Designate which election records and materials shall be retained;

Establish the manner in which the records and materials shall be maintained;

Establish by whom the records shall be maintained; and

Establish the period of time the records shall be retained, but such records shall be retained for not less than twenty-two (22) months.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 341, § 16, effective July 15, 1988.

117.030.
Announcements
and signs regarding importance of voting — Notice of illegal acts, penalties,
and right to report administrative errors at polling places.

The State Board of Elections shall publish and broadcast announcements throughout the state regarding the importance of voting in a free and conscientious manner, procedures for registering to vote and voting, general election laws, and penalties for vote buying and selling.

The State Board of Elections shall provide for the conspicuous placement of signs at all precinct polling places, which shall state that vote buying and selling are illegal and shall state the penalties for such acts.

The State Board of Elections shall provide for the conspicuous placement of signs at all precinct polling places, which display the telephone number and mailing address of the county board of elections, and which inform the voters of their right to report any administrative or clerical errors they witness to the county board of elections, either by phone or in writing within ten (10) days after the election.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 341, § 5, effective July 15, 1988; 2001, ch. 132, § 1, effective June 21, 2001.

117.035.
County board of elections — Membership — Appointed members — Meetings — Questions regarding voter registration and proof of identification — Staff.

There shall be a county board of elections, which shall, at the direction and under the supervision of the State Board of Elections, administer the election laws and the registration and purgation of voters within the county.

The board shall consist of the county clerk, the sheriff, and two (2) members appointed by the State Board of Elections under paragraph (d) of this subsection. Appointments shall occur not later than July 2021, and every four (4) years thereafter for a term of four (4) years and until their successors are appointed. All appointments under this paragraph shall be made no later than July 1 of the year in which the term expires.

The sheriff shall not serve on the board during any year in which he or she is a candidate, but shall recommend to the board a temporary replacement to serve in his or her place. If the sheriff cannot serve because he or she is sick, injured, or otherwise incapacitated, he or she may recommend a temporary replacement to serve in his or her place until the sheriff may resume his or her duties or a vacancy in office is declared.

The county clerk may, at his or her option, continue to serve on the board during a year in which he or she is a candidate. If the clerk elects not to serve, he or she shall recommend a temporary replacement to serve in his or her place. If the county clerk cannot serve because he or she is sick, injured, or otherwise incapacitated, he or she may recommend a temporary replacement to serve in his or her place until the county clerk may resume his or her duties or a vacancy in office is declared.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS

61.080

, service on the board of elections shall be compatible with the holding of any other county or city office.

The members shall be at least twenty-one (21) years of age, qualified voters in the county from which they are appointed, and shall not have been convicted of any election law offense.

One (1) member shall be appointed from a list of five (5) names submitted by the county executive committee of each political party as defined in KRS

118.015

. If there are two (2) or more contending executive committees of the same political party in any county, the one recognized by the written certificate of the chair of the state central committee of the political party shall be the one authorized to submit the lists.

If the State Board of Elections does not receive the list as required by subparagraph 3. of this paragraph for each political party for each county by the deadline established in paragraph (a) of this subsection or within one (1) month of a vacancy, then the chair of the state central committees for the political parties may submit lists of five (5) names of qualified residents from the remaining counties by August 1 of the year in which the term expires or within two (2) months of a vacancy.

If the State Board of Elections does not receive a list from either the county executive committee under subparagraph 3. of this paragraph or the chair of the state executive committee under subparagraph 4. of this paragraph, then the State Board of Elections shall appoint a qualified resident from the county at its next regularly scheduled meeting in September of the year in which the term expires or within three (3) months of a vacancy.

A member appointed by the State Board of Elections may be removed by the State Board of Elections for cause.

A member appointed by the State Board of Elections may be removed by the State Board of Elections upon a request approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the full membership of the county executive committee that submitted the member’s name. The county executive committee shall provide conclusive evidence of the committee’s membership and evidence of the committee’s two-thirds (2/3) vote before the State Board of Elections removes any member appointed by the State Board of Elections.

If an appointee is temporarily unable to act, a temporary appointee shall be named by the State Board of Elections. A temporary appointee shall serve until the original appointee notifies the State Board of Elections that he or she is able to resume his or her term.

A member appointed by the State Board of Elections shall not serve on the board if he or she is a candidate for public office, and the member shall resign upon filing papers to become a candidate for public office or shall be removed from office by the State Board of Elections. A member who resigns or is removed because of his or her candidacy shall not resume his or her term following the completion of the candidacy.

Vacancies and temporary vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as provided for original appointments, and the person appointed to fill the vacancy or temporary vacancy shall be of the same political party as his or her predecessor.

Compensation and payment of actual expenses of members shall be set by the fiscal court either as an amount payable on an annual basis, or as an amount payable on a per diem basis of not less than fifteen dollars ($15) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each day the board meets.

A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum. The county clerk shall serve as chair of the meetings and may vote. In case of a tie, the chair may cast an additional vote. Records shall be kept of all proceedings, and the records shall be public and kept at the office of the county clerk.

The board shall meet as follows:

During years in which a primary or regular election is scheduled, the board shall meet at least once every other month and may meet more frequently if necessary upon the call of the chair or upon written agreement of two (2) or more members of the board. The call shall provide notice as prescribed by KRS

61.823

.

During years in which no primary or regular election is scheduled, the board shall meet at the call of the chair or upon written agreement of two (2) or more members of the board. The call shall provide notice as prescribed by KRS

61.823

.

The board shall meet and stay in session on primary, regular election, and special election days to correct clerical errors, to rule on questions regarding voter registration, proof of identification, and the curing of signatures relative to mail-in absentee ballots, and may make to the election officers such certifications as may be necessary. On primary, regular election, and special election days, appeals may be made to a Circuit Judge, but a ruling of the board shall be reversed only upon a finding that it was arbitrary and capricious.

The board may employ, on a bipartisan basis, a staff sufficient to carry out the duties assigned to the board.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 20; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 129, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 318, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 394, § 6, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 341, § 25, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 48, § 14, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 256, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 195, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 2005, ch. 71, § 2, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 176, § 2, effective July 15, 2010; 2014, ch. 92, § 211, effective January 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 160, § 1, effective July 14, 2018; 2020 ch. 89, § 33, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 197, § 7, effective June 29, 2021.

117.045.
Precinct election officers — Alternate and emergency appointments — Minors
permitted to serve as election officers — Reimbursement.

The county board of elections shall in the manner prescribed by this section, not later than March 20 each year, except in a year in which no primary and regular elections are scheduled, appoint for each precinct in the county two (2) judges, one (1) clerk and one (1) sheriff of election. They shall serve in all elections held in the county during the year, except for minors seventeen (17) years of age who will become eighteen (18) years of age on or before the day of the regular election who may only serve as election officers for the primary and regular elections as provided in subsection (9) of this section.

If a special election is ordered to be held in a year in which no elections are scheduled, the county executive committee of each political party in each county in the territory affected by the special election shall, not later than twenty-eight (28) days preceding the date of the special election, submit a written list of nominees for precinct election officers to serve in the special election in a manner consistent with the provisions of subsection (2) of this section. The county board of elections in each county in the territory affected by the special election shall, not later than twenty-one (21) days preceding the date of the special election, appoint precinct election officers to serve in the special election in a manner consistent with the provisions of subsections (4), (5), and (6) of this section.

The State Board of Elections shall promulgate an administrative regulation under KRS Chapter 13A establishing evaluation procedures which county boards of elections may use to qualify persons nominated to serve as precinct election officers.

The county executive committees of the two (2) political parties having representation on the State Board of Elections may, on or before March 15 each year, designate in writing to the county board of elections a list of not less than four (4) names for each precinct; except that, in any precinct where there are not as many as four (4) persons possessing the qualifications of an election officer belonging to the political party filing the list, a lesser number may be designated. If there are two (2) or more contending executive committees of the same party in any county, the one recognized by the written certificate of the chair of the state central committee of the party shall be the one authorized to submit the lists. The lists shall contain the full name, address, phone number, and Social Security number, if available, of each person listed. The lists shall be accompanied by a signed statement from each person stating that he or she is willing to serve, has not failed to serve without excuse in the past, and has not been convicted of an election law offense or any felony, unless the person’s civil rights have been restored by the Governor. The State Board of Elections shall prescribe the form of the list by administrative regulation promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A.

The Attorney General shall notify each party state central committee of the duties of the party.

If lists are submitted by the county executive committees under subsection (2) of this section, the county board of elections shall select one (1) judge at each voting place from each political party’s list, and the county board shall select the sheriff from one (1) political party’s list and the clerk from the other.

If no lists are submitted by the county executive committees under subsection (2) of this section, the two (2) members of the county board of elections who are appointed by the State Board of Elections may submit lists; and the county board of elections shall select the sheriff and one (1) judge from one (1) list and the clerk and the other judge from the remaining list.

If no lists are submitted by the county executive committees under subsection (2) of this section, or by the county board of elections under paragraph (b) of this subsection, the county clerk shall select the sheriff and one (1) judge from the membership of one (1) party and the clerk and the other judge from the membership of the remaining party. If no members of one (1) of the two (2) political parties are available or willing to serve as a judge, the county clerk shall select any qualified and registered voter within the county to serve as a judge at a voting place.

The county board of elections shall, when possible, also appoint an adequate number of alternate precinct election officers from names on the lists which were submitted but which were not selected by the county board as precinct election officers. If alternate precinct election officers are not appointed from the lists of nominees who were not selected as precinct election officers, the county board of elections shall submit its method of selecting alternate precinct election officers to the State Board of Elections for its approval. If no lists are submitted to the county board of elections as provided in this subsection, the county clerk shall select an adequate number of alternate precinct election officers.

The names of all precinct election officers and alternate precinct election officers selected by the county clerk shall be submitted to the county board of elections for its approval.

Nothing in this subsection shall prevent the selection of any registered and qualified voter who is not registered with either of the two (2) political parties to serve as a precinct election officer in a precinct in which the officer resides or as otherwise provided in this subsection.

If, after all reasonable efforts have been made, neither the county board of elections nor the county clerk are able to find two (2) qualified officers for each precinct who are affiliated with the two (2) political parties having representation on the State Board of Elections or any other qualified and registered voter within the county, the county board of elections shall submit a list of emergency election officer appointments to the State Board of Elections. The county board of elections shall also present, in writing, its efforts to recruit and appoint election officers as prescribed in subsection (4) of this section. The State Board of Elections, after its review, may approve any or all of the emergency appointments submitted by the county board of elections or may direct the county board to take other action. Any emergency appointment shall be made for the next ensuing election only.

In addition to precinct election officers appointed under subsection (1) of this section, a county board of elections or the county clerk may appoint up to two (2) additional precinct election officers per precinct with the approval of the State Board of Elections. The State Board of Elections shall promulgate an administrative regulation under KRS Chapter 13A establishing conditions under which additional precinct officers may be approved.

The county board of elections shall, not less than ten (10) days before the next ensuing election, send to each election officer written notice of his or her appointment. The county board of elections may direct the sheriff of the county to serve the notice of appointment, if it deems the action is necessary.

The State Board of Elections may require the county board of elections to submit its list of precinct officers for review. The State Board of Elections may, after a hearing, direct the removal of any election officer who the board finds would not fairly administer the state election laws. The State Board of Elections shall provide for the method and manner of the hearing by administrative regulation promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A, and shall replace any officer so removed.

An election officer shall be a qualified voter of the precinct; except that, where no qualified voter of the required political party is available within the precinct, the election officer shall be a qualified voter of the county.

A minor seventeen (17) years of age who will become eighteen (18) years of age on or before the day of the regular election may serve as an election officer for the primary and regular elections in which he or she is qualified to vote; however, no precinct shall have more than one (1) person serving as an election officer who is a minor seventeen (17) years of age.

An election officer shall not be a candidate for office during the election year.

An election officer shall not be the spouse, parent, brother, sister, or child of a candidate who is to be voted for at the election in the precinct in which the election officer will serve on election day.

An election officer shall not have changed his or her voter registration party affiliation after December 31 immediately preceding his or her appointment to serve for the primary, or after the second Tuesday in August to serve for the regular election.

An election officer may be removed, for cause, at any time up to five (5) days before an election. Vacancies shall be filled by the county board of elections or the county clerk with alternate precinct election officers and if the vacancy occurs in the appointment of a judge, the person appointed to fill the vacancy shall be of the same political affiliation as the vacating officer, except for emergency appointments made as provided in subsection (5) of this section.

If the county board of elections or the county clerk fails to appoint election officers, or if any officer is not present at the precinct at the time for commencing the election, or refuses to act, and if no alternate is available, the officer in attendance representing the political party of the absentee shall appoint a suitable person to act in his or her place for that election. If both representatives of the same political party are absent, qualified voters present affiliating with that party shall elect, viva voce, suitable persons to act in their places.

Each election officer shall be paid a minimum of sixty dollars ($60) per election day served, and such an additional amount as compensation as may be determined by the county board of elections, with the approval of the governing body which would be responsible for funding the election officers’ pay, for each election in which the election officer serves, to be paid by the county. For delivering the election packets to the polls, the precinct election officers shall additionally receive the mileage reimbursement provided for state employees, for each mile necessarily traveled in the delivery of the packets to the polls, or a flat fee if the fee equals or exceeds that amount. For delivering election returns, the precinct election judges shall additionally receive the mileage reimbursement provided for state employees for each mile necessarily traveled in the delivery of election returns, or a flat fee if the fee equals or exceeds that amount. The fee paid to the precinct election judges for delivering election returns shall be paid by the county.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 21; 1976, ch. 282, § 1; 1978, ch. 318, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 395, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 394, § 7, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 470, § 6, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 341, § 26, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 48, § 15, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 180, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 394, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 195, § 5, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 243, § 3, effective April 1, 1998; 2002, ch. 63, § 11, effective July 15, 2002; 2002, ch. 265, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2010, ch. 176, § 3, effective July 15, 2010; 2021 ch. 197, § 8, effective June 29, 2021.